Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 19 State Employees’ Assurance Department

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Employees Assurance Department, Chapter 513-15-1.

47-19-1.
Creation of the State Employees’ Assurance Department; management of the department; membership of the board of directors.

There is created a department of the state government to be known as the State Employees’ Assurance Department. The department shall be managed by a board of directors consisting of the state treasurer, the Commissioner of Labor, the state auditor, the commissioner of administrative services, and two members to be appointed by the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 521, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 999, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 274, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 11/HB 805.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “state treasurer” for “director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” in the middle of the second sentence.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “commissioner of administrative services” for “commissioner of personnel administration” in this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 1/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The purpose of this Act is to make conforming amendments and correct references in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to retirement and pensions, relative to the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services as provided by a separate Act.”
The separate Act referred to is Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, which became effective July 1, 2012, and which provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 13/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, only if an Act abolishing the State Personnel Administration and providing for the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services is enacted and becomes effective on that same date; otherwise, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2012.”
Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012, provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

47-19-2.
Compensation of directors.

The directors shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses that they incur through service on the board of directors.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 521, § 2.

47-19-3.
Election of a chairman of the board of directors; employment of administrative and clerical assistants; actuarial and other services; payment of departmental expenses.

The board of directors shall elect a chairman from its membership and may employ necessary administrative and clerical assistants, who shall not be members of the board of directors. The board of directors shall engage such actuarial and other services as shall be required from time to time to transact the business of the department. The expenses of the department may be paid from funds received under any contract issued by the department or appropriated from time to time.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 521, § 3.

47-19-4.
Power of the board of directors to establish rules and regulations.

Subject to the limitations of this chapter, the board of directors may from time to time establish rules and regulations for the administration of any fund established under this chapter and for the transaction of its business.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 521, § 7.

47-19-5.
Scope of authority of the department; application of certain other insurance laws.

The department shall have only the authority granted in this chapter, together with the authority to do those things necessary for the efficient and effective accomplishment of its duties.

The department is not required to comply with Title 33.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 521, § 10.

47-19-6.
Duty to keep data for actuarial valuations.

The department shall keep in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for actuarial valuations of the funds maintained by the department and for checking the experience of its contracts.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 521, § 6.

47-19-7.
Contracts with the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia for insurance coverage.

The State Employees’ Assurance Department may contract with the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to provide group term life insurance for such persons as may be otherwise eligible for such coverage under Chapter 2 of this title. The benefit payments to be paid by reason of the death of an insured shall be made to his beneficiary or to his estate and not to the employer.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 521, § 8.

47-19-8.
Institution of actions on contracts; filing of written claim as condition precedent.

Any person who has a claim under any contract entered into by this department may bring an action on such contract in the superior court of the plaintiff’s residence. However, as a condition precedent to the filing of the action, the claimant must file with the board of directors a claim in writing outlining his contentions and claim in detail; and no action may be filed on such claim until the claim has been decided adversely to the claimant or until the expiration of 60 days, whichever is earlier.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 521, § 9.

Law reviews.

For note discussing problems with venue in Georgia, and proposing statutory revisions to improve the resolution of venue questions, see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 254 (1972).

47-19-9.
Application of the state system of personnel administration to employees of the department; payment of share of costs.

The employees of the department shall be governed by such rules of position classification, appointment, promotion, demotion, dismissal, transfer, qualification, compensation, seniority, privileges, tenure, and other employment standards as may now or hereafter be established under Chapter 20 of Title 45.

The department shall pay its share of the administrative costs of operating the state system of personnel administration, in the manner prescribed in Code Section 45-20-4.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 521, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 2009, p. 752, § 1/SB 98; Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 12/HB 805.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” in the middle of subsection (b).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “The department shall pay its pro rata share of the administrative costs of operating the State Personnel Administration, in the manner prescribed in paragraph (6) of subsection (b) of Code Section 45-20-4.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 1/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The purpose of this Act is to make conforming amendments and correct references in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to retirement and pensions, relative to the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services as provided by a separate Act.”
The separate Act referred to is Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, which became effective July 1, 2012, and which provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 413, § 13/HB 805, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, only if an Act abolishing the State Personnel Administration and providing for the transfer of certain functions of such agency to the Department of Administrative Services is enacted and becomes effective on that same date; otherwise, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2012.”
Ga. L. 2012, p. 446/HB 642, effective July 1, 2012, provides for the abolition of the State Personnel Administration and the transfer of functions.

47-19-10.
Directors defined; establishment of retired and vested inactive members trust fund; establishment of active members fund; management and investment of fund assets; contributions irrevocable.

As used in this Code section, the term “directors” means the board of directors of the State Employees’ Assurance Department.

There shall be established two separate trust funds under the control and management of the directors to be maintained for the provision of group term life insurance for eligible members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the Georgia Legislative Retirement System, and the Georgia Judicial Retirement System as follows:

One trust fund shall be known as the “retired and vested inactive members trust fund,” which shall be administered in the following manner:

There shall be accumulated in the fund the payments made to the trust fund as premiums received from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the Georgia Legislative Retirement System, and the Georgia Judicial Retirement System as premiums for retired and vested inactive members of such retirement funds, as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, including interest earned on deposits and investments of such payments; and

All assets of the trust fund and all income, interest, and dividends derived from deposits and investments shall be used for the payments of benefits and expenses necessary for the maintaining of survivors benefit coverage. Such benefits and expenses shall in no manner become an obligation of the pension accumulation fund; and

One trust fund shall be known as the “active members fund” which shall be administered in the following manner:

There shall be accumulated in the trust fund the payments made to the trust fund as premiums received from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the Georgia Legislative Retirement System, and the Georgia Judicial Retirement System as premiums for active members of such retirement funds, as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, including interest earned on deposits and investments of such payments; and

All assets of the trust fund and all income, interest, and dividends derived from deposits and investments shall be used for the payments of benefits and expenses necessary for the maintaining of survivors benefit coverage. Such benefits and expenses shall in no manner become an obligation of the pension accumulation fund.

On or before June 1 of every year, the boards of trustees of each contracting retirement system shall collect contributions from employees and employers, in accordance with the laws governing the individual retirement systems, and shall transmit such funds to the directors. The directors shall deposit such funds in the trust funds established by this Code section in such respective amounts as directed by the actuary for the directors.

The directors shall be authorized to contract with the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia for the management and investment of all fund assets and for the provision of actuarial services. Such assets may be commingled with other assets under the control of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, but shall be separately accounted for.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, employee and employer contributions to the trust funds established by this Code section are irrevocable. The assets of such trust funds are dedicated to providing benefits to active, retired, and vested inactive members and their beneficiaries in accordance with the terms of the plan for group term life insurance. All trust fund assets are protected from creditors of any employer or of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the Georgia Legislative Retirement System, the Georgia Judicial Retirement System, or the State Employees’ Assurance Department.

No moneys in either the retired and vested inactive members trust fund or the active members fund established by subsection (b) of this Code section shall transferred or be expended for any purpose other than the payment of benefits and expenses necessary for the maintaining of survivors benefit coverage prior to July 1, 2009, without express legislative enactment.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-19-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 176, § 3/HB 448; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1005, § 2/SB 328.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added subsection (f).